nl: Ondersteunde frequentie/radiobanden: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Niet ondersteund; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Andere
vi: Tần số/dải vô tuyến được hỗ trợ: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Không hỗ trợ; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Khác
zh-TW: 支援的頻段/無線電頻帶: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; 不支援; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; 其他
es: Frecuencia o bandas de radio compatibles: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; No compatible; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Otros
bg-BG: Поддържани честоти/радиочестотни ленти: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Не се поддържа; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Други
th: รองรับความถี่/คลื่นวิทยุ: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; ไม่รองรับ; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Benzi de frecvență/radio compatibile: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Neacceptat; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Altele
pl: Obsługiwane pasma częstotliwości/radiowe: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nieobsługiwane; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Inne
fi: Tuetut taajuudet/radiokaistat: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Ei tuettu; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Muu
sl-SI: Podprti frekvenčni/radijski pasovi: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Ni podprto; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Drugo
lt-LT: Palaikomas dažnis/ radijo diapazonai: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nepalaikoma; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Kita
hu: Támogatott frekvencia/rádiósávok: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nem támogatott; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Egyéb
hr-HR: Podržani frekvencijski/radiofrekvencijski pojasevi: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nije podržano; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Ostalo
da: Frekvens/radiobånd understøttet: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Ikke understøttet; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Andet
fr: Fréquences/bandes radio prises en charge: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Non pris en charge; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Autre
ko: 지원되는 주파수/무선 대역: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; 지원되지 않음; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; 기타
nb: Frekvens/radiobånd støttes: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Ikke støttet; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Annet
en: Frequency/Radio bands supported: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Not supported; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Other
ru: Поддерживаемые диапазоны частот: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Не поддерживается; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Другой
ja: 対応している周波数/無線帯域: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; 非対応; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; その他
sk-SK: Podporované frekvenčné/rádiové pásma: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nie je podporované; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Iné
pt-BR: Bandas de frequência/rádio com suporte: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Não compatível; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Outro
pt-PT: Bandas de frequência/rádio suportadas: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Não suportado; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Outro
zh-CN: 支持的频段/无线电频段: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; 不支持; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; 其他
tr: Desteklenen Frekans/Radyo Bantları: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Desteklenmiyor; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Diğer
el: Υποστηριζόμενες ζώνες συχνοτήτων/ραδιοσυχνοτήτων: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Δεν υποστηρίζεται; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Άλλο
sv: Frekvens/radioband som stöds: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Stöds inte; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Övrigt
de: Unterstützte Frequenz-/Funkbereiche: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nicht unterstützt; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Sonstiges
it: Bande di frequenza/radio supportate: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Non supportata; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Altro
cs: Podporované frekvence / pásma rádiového vysílání: AM; DAB; DAB+; DMB; DMB-A; DMB-R; FM; LW; MF; MW; Nepodporováno; PLL; S; SW; UHF; UKW; VHF; Jiné